Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.904

Transfer of certain powers, duties, functions, and assets of the office of financial management.

(1) The powers, duties, and functions of the office of financial management as set forth in Part V, chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. are hereby transferred to the department of enterprise services.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of financial management pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the office of financial management in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the office of financial management in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the office of financial management for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on October 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of enterprise services.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of financial management pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of enterprise services.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the office of financial management shall not affect the validity of any act performed before October 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the office of financial management engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of enterprise services, are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to department of enterprise services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1007.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.